District of Columbia statutes.
44-106.07

Services to be provided.

(a)

An ALR shall provide or ensure the provision of the following:

(1)

Twenty-four hour supervision and oversight to ensure the well-being and safety of its residents;

(2)

Three nutritious and attractive meals and additional snacks, modified to individual dietary needs as necessary, on a daily basis;

(3)

A variety of fresh and seasonal foods, adapted to the food habits, preferences, and physical abilities of the residents;

(4)

At minimum, some assistance with ADLs and IADLs to meet the scheduled and unscheduled service needs of the residents; and

(5)

Laundry and housekeeping service not provided by the resident or surrogate.

(b)

An ALR shall facilitate access for a resident to appropriate health and social services, including social work, home health agencies, nursing, rehabilitative, hospice, medical, dental, dietary, counseling, and psychiatric services.

(c)

An ALR shall provide or coordinate scheduled transportation to community-based services.

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 607, 47 DCR 2647